District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Place-Based Substance Use Disorder Outreach Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec 2. The Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act of 2013, effective
December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 7-1141.01 et seq.), is amended by
adding a new Part C to read as follows:
“PART C.
“Sec. 5120d. Definitions.
“For the purposes of this part, the term:
“(1) “Direct support” means behavioral health crises assessment and intervention
services.
“(2) “High-need area” means a defined geographic area, which may include a
neighborhood, corridor, or cluster of blocks, designated by the Department as experiencing a
disproportionately high concentration of substance use disorder activity, including opioid use,
overdoses, or related behavioral health service needs, based on available public health data,
service utilization data, or other relevant indicators.
“(3) “Relationship development” means regular interactions, and the
incorporation of peer supports, when possible, that foster open communications and encourage
active engagement with behavioral health services for individuals using substances.
“(4) “Resource brokering” means assistance with accessing supportive services
and public benefits, including housing, food, Medicaid, Social Security Income or Social
Security Disability Insurance, and transportation services needed to access primary and
behavioral health care.
“Sec. 5120e. Establishment of the Place-Based Substance Use Disorder Outreach
Program.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(a) There is established, within the Department, the Place-Based Substance Use
Disorder Outreach Program (“Program”), which shall issue grants to 501(c)(3) not-for-profit
organizations with experience in providing direct supports, relationship development, and
resource brokering to individuals in need of substance use treatment and behavioral health
services in high-need areas.
“(b)(1) The Department, in consultation with the grantees, may designate a high-need
area for a period of time to be determined by the Department based on programmatic needs, but
not to exceed 180 days.
“(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Department may
designate a high-need area for a period not to exceed 90 days if the Department determines that
emergent circumstances warrant immediate intervention.
“(3) The Department may modify the geographic boundaries of a high-need area
if data indicates that substance use activity has shifted to nearby locations.
“(c) In designating a high-need area, the Department shall consider whether, within the
preceding 6-month period, there was a disproportionately high rate of:
“(1) Substantiated reports of substance use in public spaces;
“(2) Hospitalizations, overdoses, and deaths from substance use;
“(3) High reoccurrences of the same individuals using substances in the same
vicinity; or
“(4) Areas with a high concentration of pedestrian and business interaction with
people experiencing substance use disorder.
“(d) For each designated high-need area, the Department shall within 45 days of the
designation:
“(1) Notify local businesses, business improvement districts, and relevant
community-based organizations of the high-need area designation and provide information on:
“(A) The purpose and scope of the Program, including the services and
supports available;
“(B) How to contact the grantee assigned to the area; and
“(C) How to request services or support for individuals who may need
substance use disorder treatment or behavioral health services; and
“(2) Make reasonable efforts to ensure that contact information for the assigned
grantee is maintained and updated throughout the designation period.
“(e) Beginning 6 months after this part is applicable, and annually thereafter, the
Department shall publish program performance data, for each designated high-need area, on a
publicly accessible website and report that includes:
“(1) Program performance metrics, broken down by location, including the:
“(A) Number of individuals engaged through outreach efforts;
“(B) Number and percentage of individuals engaged more than once and 3
or more times;
“(C) Number of individuals connected to substance use disorder treatment
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
programs, primary healthcare, mental health services, housing assistance, employment support,
or other services;
“(D) Number of individuals who successfully attended at least one
appointment or intake following referral, to the extent such data is available;
“(E) Average length of time between initial outreach engagement and
connection to services;
“(F) Number of overdose reversals or interventions performed using
overdose reversal medications;
“(G) Amount of harm reduction supplies distributed; and
“(H) Number of educational sessions, workshops, or prevention activities
delivered to target populations, and other performance data as determined by the Director;
“(2) A summary of barriers to individuals receiving services and the steps taken
or planned to address those barriers, including:
“(A) Service capacity limitations;
“(B) Eligibility barriers;
“(C) Individual refusal or disengagement; and
“(D) Delays related to housing, insurance, or identification requirements;
and
“(3) For each designated high-need area, a narrative describing:
“(A) Observed changes in substance use activity within the area;
“(B) Any displacement of activity to nearby locations;
“(C) Changes made to outreach strategies;
“(D) Outreach and engagement with local businesses, business
improvement districts, and community-based organizations; and
“(E) Feedback received from community members, businesses, or service
providers, including any efforts made to solicit such feedback.
“(f) The Department shall establish regular interagency coordination meetings, or
develop written protocols to support collaboration, with:
“(1) The Metropolitan Police Department;
“(2) The Department of Human Services;
“(3) The Child and Family Services Agency;
“(4) The Department of Health;
“(5) The Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development;
and
“(6) Any other agency the Department deems appropriate.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
(a) This act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget
and financial plan.
(b)The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
of the certification.
(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the
District of Columbia Register.
(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of this act.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
4